Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201683-1206.01
Intellectual disability, defined.

Intellectual disability means significant subaverage general intellectual functioning which is associated with significant impairments in adaptive functioning manifested before the age of twenty-two years. Significant subaverage general intellectual functioning shall refer to a score of seventy or below on a properly administered and valid intelligence quotient test.

Laws 2016, LB1039, § 5.
July 21, 2016